Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.100

Advertisements—Copy to be filed.

No person shall publish in this state any advertisements offering a franchise subject to the registration requirements of this law unless a true copy of the advertisement has been filed in the office of the director at least seven days prior to the publication or such shorter period as the director by rule or order may allow.

[ 1991 c 226 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 10.]